Utah statutes.
63I-1-253.   Repeal dates, Titles 53, 53A, and 53B.
The following provisions are repealed on the following dates:
(1)  Section 53-3-232, Conditional licenses, is repealed July 1, 2015.
(2)  Title 53A, Chapter 1a, Part 6, Public Education Job Enhancement Program
is repealed July 1, 2010.
(3)  Title 53A, Chapter 1a, Part 9, Voluntary Extended-day Kindergarten
Program, is repealed July 1, 2011.
(4)  The State Instructional Materials Commission, created in Section
53A-14-101, is repealed July 1, 2011.
(5)  Section 53A-17a-163, Performance-based Compensation Pilot Program is
repealed July 1, 2011.
